Maryland, session 2026, HB1416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–302.
(a) (1) (i) 1. Except for leases of real property, each unit shall structure
procurement procedures, consistent with the purposes of this subtitle, to try to achieve an
overall percentage goal of the unit’s total dollar value of procurement contracts being made
directly or indirectly to certified minority business enterprises.
2. Notwithstanding subsubparagraph 1 of this
subparagraph, the following contracts may not be counted as part of a unit’s total dollar
value of procurement contracts:
A. a procurement contract awarded in accordance with
Subtitle 1 of this title;
B. a procurement contract awarded to a nonprofit entity in
accordance with requirements mandated by State or federal law; and
C. a procurement by the Maryland Developmental
Disabilities Administration of the Maryland Department of Health for family and
individual support services, community residential services, resource coordination services,
behavioral support services, vocational and day services, and respite services, as those
terms are defined in regulations adopted by the Maryland Department of Health.
(ii) 1. The overall percentage goal shall be established on a
biennial basis by the Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, and Women
Business Affairs, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, the Chief
Procurement Officer, and the Attorney General.
2. During any year in which there is a delay in establishing
the overall goal, the previous year’s goal will apply.
(iii) 1. In consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, the
Chief Procurement Officer, and the Attorney General, the Special Secretary for the Office
of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall establish guidelines on a biennial
basis for each unit to consider while determining whether to set subgoals for the minority
groups listed in § 14–301(k)(1)(i)1, 2, 3, 4, and 6 of this subtitle.
2. During any year in which there is a delay in establishing
the subgoal guidelines, the previous year’s subgoal guidelines will apply.

HOUSE BILL 1416 3
(iv) 1. The Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority,
and Women Business Affairs, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, the
Chief Procurement Officer, and the Attorney General, shall establish goals and subgoal
guidelines that, to the maximum extent feasible, approximate the level of minority business
enterprise participation that would be expected in the absence of discrimination.
2. In establishing overall goals and subgoal guidelines, the
Special Secretary for the Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall
provide for public participation by consulting with minority, women’s, and general
contractor groups, community organizations, and other officials or organizations that could
be expected to have information concerning:
A. the availability of minority– and women–owned
businesses;
B. the effects of discrimination on opportunities for
minority– and women–owned businesses; and
C. the State’s operation of the Minority Business Enterprise
Program.
(v) In establishing overall goals, the factors to be considered shall
include:
1. the relative availability of minority– and women–owned
businesses to participate in State procurement as demonstrated by the State’s most recent
disparity study;
2. past participation of minority business enterprises in
State procurement, except for procurement related to leases of real property; and
3. other factors that contribute to constitutional goal setting.
(vi) Notwithstanding § 12–101 of this article, the Special Secretary
for the Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs shall adopt regulations in
accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article setting forth the
State’s overall goal.
(18) FOR A CONTRACT THAT INCLUDES PROVISIONS FOR THE
EQUIPMENT SUPPLY AND INSTALLATION OF ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING
EQUIPMENT, A UNIT SHALL SET AN EXPECTED DEGREE OF MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION SPECIFICALLY FOR THOSE PROVISIONS THAT ARE
EQUIVALENT TO THE PERCENTAGE GOAL FOR THE OVERALL PROCUREMENTS FOR
THAT UNIT.

HOUSE BILL 1416
Article – Transportation
2–115.
(A) THE FINDINGS AND EVIDENCE RELIED ON BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
FOR THE CONTINUATION OF THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM
UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE ARE HEREBY INCORPORATED.
(B) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND PERMITTED BY THE UNITED STATES
CONSTITUTION, A PERSON RECEIVING $100,000 OR MORE OF STATE FUNDING,
WHETHER BY GRANT OR LOAN, FOR THE PURCHASE OR INSTALLATION OF ELECTRIC
VEHICLE CHARGING EQUIPMENT SHALL COMPLY WITH THE STATE’S MINORITY
BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM.
(C) THE UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT UNDER WHICH STATE FUNDING WAS
PROVIDED SHALL, AS A CONDITION OF PROVIDING THE FUNDING, REQUIRE THE
RECIPIENT TO DEMONSTRATE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL, SHALL ESTABLISH A CLEAR PLAN FOR SETTING REASONABLE AND
APPROPRIATE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS AND
PROCEDURES FOR THE PURCHASE AND INSTALLATION OF ELECTRIC VEHICLE
CHARGING EQUIPMENT THAT IS FUNDED THROUGH STATE FUNDING.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE GOALS AND PROCEDURES
SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE BASED ON THE
REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND THE REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTING THAT SUBTITLE.
(3) WITHIN 12 MONTHS FOLLOWING THE RECEIPT OF STATE
FUNDING, THE RECIPIENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE OFFICE REGARDING
THE RECIPIENT’S COMPLIANCE WITH THE GOALS AND PROCEDURES SPECIFIED IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.